Maryland, session 2025, SB0013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Study African American Civil War Sailors in
Maryland.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House; and
(3) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative from the State Archives;
(ii) one representative from the Department of Planning;
(iii) one representative from the Governor’s Commission on
Maryland Military Monuments;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0013*

SENATE BILL 13
(iv) one representative from the Commission on African American
History and Culture;
(v) one representative from Preservation Maryland, Inc.; and
(vi) one representative from the Heart of the Civil War Heritage
Area, Inc.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Commission.
(d) The State Archives shall provide staff for the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission shall:
(1) study the history of African American Civil War sailors who fought for
the Union Navy in Maryland, including muster rolls, locations of service, and all
distinguished honors and recognitions awarded; and
(2) make findings and recommendations regarding the funding, design,
construction, and location of an appropriate memorial dedicated to the African American
Civil War sailors in Maryland.
(g) On or before December 1, 2025, the Commission shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2026, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.